lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_finalE-noHop.txt
^[Loc.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meggn  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meggn  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmeggn        VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegn         VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megten VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megten VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegten       VerbRootEte;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
